Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-8,134
Attracting Excellence to Teaching Program; purposes.

The purposes of the Attracting Excellence to Teaching Program are to:

(1) Attract outstanding students to major in shortage areas at the teacher education programs of Nebraska's postsecondary educational institutions;

(2) Retain resident students and graduates as teachers in the accredited school districts, educational service units, and private schools or approved private schools of Nebraska; and

(3) Establish a loan contract that requires a borrower to obtain employment as a teacher in this state after graduation.

Laws 2000, LB 1399, § 17;

Laws 2009, LB547, § 5;

Laws 2015, LB519, § 3.